apertium-tlh.tlh.morf.twol
Alphabet

a e i o u y ä ö
b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S Š T U V W X Y Z Ž Å Ä Ö

’:%' %':’ ’ %'
%-

!0	1	2	3	4	5	6	7	8	9	A	B	C	D	E	F
!U+F8Dx																
!U+F8Ex																
!U+F8Fx																
! boundaries
a:
b:
c: ! ch
h:0
d:
e:
g: ! gh
H:
I:
j:
l:
m:
n:
n: ! ng
g:0 
o:
p:
q:
Q:
r:
s:
t:
t: ! tlh
l:0 
u:
v:
w:
y:
’:
%0:
1:
2:
3:
4:
5:
6:
7:
8:
9:
,:
.:
h:0

’:0

;

Sets
Vowels = a e i o u y ä ö ;
Consonants = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ;
UpperOrSyms = A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S Š T U V W X Y Z Ž Å Ä Ö  %0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 %- ;

Rules


"h removal in transcribe"
h:0 <=>  g: _ ;
         t: l:0   _  ;
         c: _ ;

"l removal in transcribe"
l:0 <=> _ h:0 ;

"g removal in transcribe"
g:0 <=> n: _ ;

"’ assimilates to tlh?"
’:0 <=> t l h _ ;
